Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6845
Nebraska-based covered entity under federal law; agreement; contents; limitations.

(1) An agreement issued pursuant to section 77-6844 shall contain total incentives, refunds, and credits earned through the ImagiNE Nebraska Act sufficient to equal twenty-five percent of the taxpayer's investment in qualified property for the fabrication, assembly, testing, advanced packaging, or production of semiconductors or technologies with extensive microelectronic content. The director shall ensure that such agreement creates no additional obligation upon the General Fund.

(2) With respect to an application or agreement with a taxpayer that is a Nebraska-based covered entity as defined in 15 U.S.C. 4651 under the Creating Helpful Incentives to Produce Semiconductors (CHIPS) for America Act, Public Law 116-283:

(a) The provisions of section 77-6839 shall not apply, except that the annual credits and incentives redeemed by the taxpayer may be limited to one-fifteenth of the total credits and incentives eligible to be earned during a fifteen-year performance period, as defined by section 77-6816; and

(b) The taxpayer may not carryover earned but unused incentives past the performance period.

Laws 2023, LB92, § 83.